Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3919
Registration of protective orders.

If a conservator
has been appointed in another state and a petition for a protective order
is not pending in this state, the conservator appointed in the other state,
after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may
register the protective order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment
in a court of this state, in every county in which property belonging to the
protected person is located as required by section 25-2708, certified copies
of the order and letters of office and of any bond.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 23.